apertium-khk.khk.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!  M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · K H A L K H A  !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! See https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_lexicon

Multichar_Symbols
! Followed https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_languages

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>         ! Noun                       ! Зат есім
%<np%>        ! Proper noun
%<adj%>       ! Adjective                  ! Сын есім
%<num%>       ! Numeral                    ! Сан есім
%<prn%>       ! Pronoun
%<det%>       ! Determiner
%<v%>         ! Verb
%<vaux%>      ! Auxilary verb
%<adv%>       ! Adverb                     ! Үстеу            ! Наречие
%<post%>      ! Postposition               ! Септеулік шылау
%<postadv%>   ! Postadverb                 ! "Артүстеу"
%<cnjcoo%>    ! Co-ordinating conjunction  ! жалғаулық шылау
%<cnjsub%>    ! Sub-ordinating conjunction ! жалғаулық шылау
%<cnjadv%>    ! Adverbial conjunction      ! жалғаулық шылау
%<part%>      ! Particle
%<ij%>        ! Interjection               ! Одағай
%<abbr%>      ! Abbreviation
%<cop%>       ! Copula

! Proper noun types
%<top%>       ! Toponym
%<ant%>       ! Anthroponym
%<cog%>       ! Cognomen
%<pat%>       ! Patronym     ! Отчество
%<org%>       ! Organization
%<al%>        ! Other

!! gender of anthroponyms and cognoms
%<m%>         ! Masculine
%<f%>         ! Feminine
%<mf%>        ! Masculine/feminine !# basically cognoms without -ов/-ова,
              ! -ин/-ина endings

! "Syntactic" tags. Attributive use of non-adjectives etc.
%<attr%>      ! Attributive
%<subst%>     ! Substantive
%<advl%>      ! Adverbial

! Number
%<sg%>        ! Singular
%<pl%>        ! Plural

! Possessives
%<px1sg%>     ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>     ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>     ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>     ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>     ! Second person plural
%<px%>        ! General possessive          !# -нікі

! Cases
%<nom%>       ! Nominative
%<gen%>       ! Genitive
%<gens%>      ! Short/clitic Genitive (used with nouns)
%<dat%>       ! Dative
%<acc%>       ! Accusative
%<abl%>       ! Ablative
%<loc%>       ! Locative
%<ins%>       ! Instrumental
%<dir%>       ! Directional

%<refl%>      ! Reflexive

!! some additional ~cases
%<sim%>       ! Similative (<apprx> in kymorph)
              !# DAй
%<abe%>       ! Abessive=Privative ! Лишительный
              !# -сыз/-сез (not used after posessives and cases)
%<reas%>      ! Reason

! Levels of comparison of adjectives
%<comp%>      ! Comparative
%<sup%>       ! Superlative

! Pronoun types
%<pers%>      ! Personal
%<recip%>     ! Reciprocal
! Pronoun and determiner types
%<dem%>       ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>       ! Indefinite
%<itg%>       ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>       ! Quantifier
%<neg%>       ! Negative       !# еш нерсе
              ! (NOTE: also used to denote negation in verbs, i.e for м{A})
%<ref%>       ! Reflexive

! Numeral types
%<ord%>       ! Ordinal
%<coll%>      ! Collective
%<dist%>      ! Distributive

! Verbal features

!! Mood
%<imp%>       ! Imperative
%<opt%>       ! Optative/jussive
%<sug%>       ! Suggestion

!! Derivation
%<caus%>      ! Causative
%<pass%>      ! Passive
%<coop%>      ! Cooperative

!! Tense / finite forms
%<pres%>      ! for "жатыр", "тұр", "отыр" and "жүр"
%<aor%>       ! -{E}                    ! non-past (afaik /IS/)
%<past%>      ! -{G}{A}н                ! past
%<ifi%>       ! -{D}{I}                 ! eyewitness past
%<hab%>       ! habitual
%<ifi_evid%>  ! -{I}пт{I}               ! "reported past" (afaik /IS/)
%<fut%>       ! -{I}р                   ! future
%<fut_plan%>  ! -{M}{A}{K}              ! future plan

%<evid%>      ! evidential
              ! Was used for -ган екен and -ыпты. The former is not handled here
              ! in lexc anymore, the latter was renamed from <ifi><evid> to
              ! <ifi_evid>

!! Non-Finite verb forms
%<gna%>       ! generic verbal adverb
%<gna_prf%>   ! perfective verbal adverb
%<gna_imp%>   ! imperfective verbal adverb
%<gna_cnd%>   ! conditional verbal adverb
%<gna2%>      ! "until" verbal adverb
%<ger%>       ! future gerund
%<ger_imp%>   ! imperfective gerund
%<ger_prf%>   ! perfective gerund

!!! Participles

!! Transitivity
%<tv%>        ! Transitive
%<iv%>        ! Intransitive
%<TD%>        ! Temporary tag

! Person
%<p1%>        ! First person
%<p2%>        ! Second person
%<p3%>        ! Third person
%<frm%>       ! Formality
%<infm%>      ! Informal

! Modal particles
%<qst%>       ! Modal question particle
%<mod_foc%>   ! "Particles of politeness and ardent desire"
              ! (as in [N. Poppe. Tatar Manual]) or
              ! "what about ..." question particles" :)
              ! (as in kir.lexc)
%<mod_ass%>   ! Assertive modal particle
%<mod%>       ! Modal verbs (шығар, сияқты etc)

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

%{г%}
%{й%}
%{а%}
%{А%}
%{А1%}
%{А2%}
%{I%}
%{ь%}
%{В%}
%{Т%}
%{У%}
%{Д%}
%{н%}
%{Н%}
%{ң%}         ! for nouns ending in н that's /ŋ/ and not /n/→[ŋ]
%{ъ%}         ! blocks voicing assimilation, mostly of Д for "irregular" locatives and Ж irregular verbal adverbs
%{Ж%}
%{Р%}

%>            ! Morpheme boundary
!%             ! Space
%-            !
%,            !
%.            !
%%            !
%+            ! clitic space

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Pronouns ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverbs ;
Adjectives ;
Postpositions ;
Postadverbs ;
Determiners ;
Numbers ;
Particles ;     ! UGH
ProperNouns ;
Punctuation ;


LEXICON Clit-Qst
+вэ%<qst%>:% %{В%}э # ;         ! wh-question
+уу%<qst%>:% %{У%}%{У%} # ;     ! yes/no-question

LEXICON Clit-NonQst

+даа%<qst%>:% д%{А1%}%{А2%} # ;   !
+аа%<qst%>:% %{А1%}%{А2%} # ;     !
+билээ%<qst%>:% билээ # ;       ! assumed previously known information (?)


LEXICON Clit
! Sentence-final clitics

# ;
Clit-Qst ;
Clit-NonQst ;


LEXICON Cases-Normal

%<nom%>: Clit ;
%<acc%>:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

%<nom%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

%<gen%>:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}н Clit ;
%<gen%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}нх%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<abl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
%<abl%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<ins%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
%<ins%>%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<dat%>:%>%{а%}%{Д%} Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
%<dat%>%<refl%>:%>д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! (with exceptional forms in т)

%<dat%>%<attr%>:% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

%<gens%>:%>%{а%}н # ;

%<dir%>:%>% %{Р%}%{У%}%{У%} Clit ;


LEXICON Cases-ExtraN

%<nom%>: Clit ;
%<acc%>:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

%<refl%>:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

%<gen%>:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%} Clit ;
%<gen%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%}х%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<abl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
%<abl%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<ins%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
%<ins%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

%<dat%>:%>%{а%}%{Н%}д Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
%<dat%>%<refl%>:%>%{Н%}д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! (with exceptional forms in т)

%<dat%>%<attr%>:%{а%}%{Н%}% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

%<gens%>:%>%{а%}н # ;

%<dir%>:%>% %{Р%}%{У%}%{У%} Clit ;

LEXICON PrnInfl

%<prn%>: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON DetInfl

%<det%>: # ;

LEXICON Ninfl

%<n%>: Cases-Normal ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{н%}%{У%}%{У%}д Cases-Normal ;  ! (with exceptional forms)

LEXICON Pronouns
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:намайг Clit ;
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:миний Clit ;
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:надаас Clit ;
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:надад Clit ;
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:надаар Clit ;
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:минийх Clit ;    ! FIXME: check
би%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gens%>:минь Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:бид Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:биднийг Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:бидний Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:биднээс Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:бидэнд Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:биднээр Clit ;
бид%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<px%>:биднийх Clit ; ! FIXME: Check
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:чи Clit ;
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:чамайг Clit ;
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:чиний Clit ;
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:чамаас Clit ;
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:чамд Clit ;
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:чамаар Clit ;  ! FIXME: check
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<px%>:чинийх Clit ;    ! FIXME: check
чи%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gens%>:чинь Clit ;
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<nom%>:та Clit ;
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<acc%>:таныг Clit ;
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<gen%>:таны Clit ;
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<dat%>:танд Clit ;
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<px%>:таных Clit ;   ! FIXME: check
та%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<gens%>:тань Clit ;
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:тэр Clit ;
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:түүнийг Clit ;
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:түүний Clit ;
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:түүнээс Clit ;
тэр%<dem%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:тэнд Clit ;     ! loc
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:түүнд Clit ;    ! dat/loc
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:тэрээр Clit ;  ! FIXME: check
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:түүнийх Clit ;   ! FIXME: check
тэр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gens%>:нь Clit ;
тэд%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:тэд Clit ;
тэд%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:тэднийг Clit ;
тэд%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:тэдний Clit ;
тэд%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:тэдэнд Clit ;   ! FIXME: check
тэд%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<px%>:тэднийх Clit ;   ! FIXME: check
хэн PrnInfl ;            ! "who"
юу PrnInfl ;             ! "what"
өөр PrnInfl ;            ! "oneself"
энэ:эн PrnInfl ;         ! "this one"
ямар:ям%{а%}р PrnInfl ;  ! "which one"
тийм:тийм PrnInfl ;      ! "one like that"
ийм:ийм PrnInfl ;        ! "one like this"
бүгд:бүгд PrnInfl ;      ! "everyone"
нөгөө:нөг PrnInfl ;         ! "other one"
LEXICON Nouns
байр:байр Ninfl ; ! "apartment"
дарга:дарга Ninfl ; ! "boss"
муур:муур Ninfl ; ! "cat"
пальто Ninfl ; ! "coat"
үхэр:үхэр Ninfl ; ! "cow"
нохой:нохой Ninfl ; ! "dog"
орой:орой Ninfl ; ! "evening"
сэрээ:сэрээ Ninfl ; ! "fork"
бээлий:бээлий Ninfl ; ! "glove"
морь:морь Ninfl ; ! "(word/riding) horse"
хүрэм:хүрэм Ninfl ; ! "jacket"
үсэг:үсэг Ninfl ; ! "letter"
ээж:ээж Ninfl ; ! "mother"
дэвтэр:дэвтэр Ninfl ; ! "notebook"
үзэг:үзэг Ninfl ; ! "pen"
таваг:таваг Ninfl ; ! "plate"
өрөө:өрөө Ninfl ; ! "room"
хонь:хонь Ninfl ; ! "sheep"
эгч:эгч Ninfl ; ! "sister"
хүү:хүү Ninfl ; ! "son"
ус:ус Ninfl ; ! "water"
буга:буга Ninfl ; ! "deer"
нутаг:нутаг Ninfl ; ! "homeland"
ам:ам Ninfl ; ! "mouth"
ёс:ёс Ninfl ; ! "culture"?
ус:ус Ninfl ; ! "water"
тойм Ninfl ; ! "report/review/summary?"
цэрэг:цэр%{а%}г Ninfl ; ! "soldier"?
ЭЗЭН:ЭЗЭН Ninfl ; ! "The Lord"
удаа:удаа Ninfl ; ! "time, occurrence"
өвөл:өв%{а%}л Ninfl ; ! "winter"
тунхаглал:тунхаглал Ninfl ; ! "declaration"
амжилт:амжилт Ninfl ; ! "success"
медаль:медаль Ninfl ; ! "medal"
үндсэн:үндс%{а%}н Ninfl ; ! "basis, foundation"
хур:хур Ninfl ; ! "precipitation"
хэл:хэл Ninfl ; ! "tongue, language"
үр:үр Ninfl ; ! ""
ойр:ойр Ninfl ; ! "one that's near"
ууль:ууль Ninfl ; ! ""
зайрмаг:зайрмаг Ninfl ; ! "icecream"
улирал:улирал Ninfl ; ! "season"
авьяас:авьяас Ninfl ; ! "talent"
гэм:гэм Ninfl ; ! "guilt"
